District of Columbia statutes.
47-3911

Repealed

Testimony; production of books and records.

Repealed.

Sept. 20, 1989, D.C. Law 8-26, § 12, 36 DCR 4723
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(ddd)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-3911.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”